District of Columbia statutes.
50-1106

Penalties.

(a)

Any individual, partnership, firm, or corporation found guilty of using or permitting the use of any unregistered motor vehicle or trailer, or who is found guilty of using or permitting the use of the same during the period for which any such vehicle’s registration is revoked or suspended under the terms of this chapter, shall, for each such offense, be fined not more than $300.

(b)

A late penalty of $15 shall be assessed if a vehicle has not been inspected by the date required by the Director pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. An additional late penalty of $15 shall be assessed for each month that the vehicle has not been inspected. All late penalties shall be deposited into the District of Columbia Motor Vehicle Biennial Inspection Fund established in § 50-1102.

Feb. 18, 1938, 52 Stat. 78, ch. 31, § 6
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-289, § 203(c), 48 DCR 2057
D.C. Law 13-289 designated the existing text as subsec. (a) and added subsec. (b).
1973 Ed., § 40-206.
1981 Ed., § 40-206.